Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1403
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; designation process.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a designation process for family resource and juvenile assessment centers to ensure adherence to high-quality standards in service delivery, staff qualifications, and organizational effectiveness.

(2) A center seeking designation shall complete a comprehensive self-assessment based on the national Standards of Quality for Family Strengthening and Support or a similar benchmark framework and shall submit an application and the self-assessment to the department for review.

(3) The department shall conduct site visits and staff interviews as part of the review process to verify self-assessment findings and confirm compliance with designation standards.

(4) A center that meets the designation criteria will receive official designation. A center that does not meet the designation criteria shall receive feedback and technical assistance so that such center may improve and reapply for designation.

(5) Two centers shall be selected for the pilot program established pursuant to section 42-1401.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 3.
The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705(1)(g), has corrected a manifest clerical error in Laws 2025, LB48, section 3, by changing the word "designate" to the word "establish" in subsection (1) of section 42-1403.